Missouri, session 2026, SB1314.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 163, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 163.420, to read as
follows:
163.420. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, each
parent or guardian of a child between the ages of seven
years and the compulsory attendance age for the district, as
defined in section 167.031, in which the parent or guardian
resides, shall be afforded the opportunity at the time of
enrollment to direct that state aid under this chapter that
would be used to educate the student at a school within the
district of residence shall be remitted to a qualified
school of the parent or guardian's choice, if the parent or
guardian chooses a school outside of the district of
residence. A parent or guardian may choose to enroll their
student in a different school within the school district of
residence. The state treasurer shall create and provide to
each school district a form for use by a parent or guardian
at the time of enrollment to indicate the parent or

SB 1314 2
guardian's choice as to the qualified school their student
will attend for that school year.
2. The school district shall transmit any forms
received, as provided in subsection 1 of this section, to
the state treasurer. The school district shall also notify
the department of elementary and secondary education within
seven days of the parent submitting the form to the school.
3. Upon receipt of the form, the state treasurer shall
remit, within thirty days, state aid under this chapter that
would have been remitted to the school district of residence
for the purpose of educating the student to the qualified
school chosen by the parent or guardian if the parent or
guardian chooses a school outside of the school district of
residence.
4. The school district shall notify the department of
elementary and secondary education, within seven days of the
parent or guardian submitting the form, that the student
shall no longer be attending a school within the district,
if applicable. If the student enrolls in a qualified
school, other than a public school located in the same
school district of residence, the student shall not be
counted in the resident school district's weighted average
daily attendance as a resident student for purposes of
determining state and federal aid for the student's resident
school district.
5. As used in this section, the term "qualified
school" shall include any of the following entities that is
incorporated in Missouri and that does not discriminate on
the basis of race, color, or national origin:
(1) A charter school as defined in section 160.400;
(2) A private school, which shall mean a school that
is not part of the public school system of the state of

SB 1314 3
Missouri and that charges tuition for the rendering of
elementary and secondary educational services;
(3) A public school as defined in section 160.011; or
(4) A public or private virtual school.
6. As used in this section, the term "state aid" shall
mean the lesser of the state adequacy target for the student
or the amount of tuition at the qualified school.
Section B. Because of the need to provide parents with
certainty regarding schooling and child care arrangements
for the upcoming school year, section A of this act is
deemed necessary for the immediate preservation of the
public health, welfare, peace, and safety, and is hereby
declared to be an emergency act within the meaning of the
constitution, and section A of this act shall be in full
force and effect upon its passage and approval.
✓